Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Article 1 Protection of Tidewaters

Law reviews.

For note on 1992 enactment of this article, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 354 (1992).

52-1-1.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Protection of Tidewaters Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1.

52-1-2.
Legislative findings and declaration of policy; public trust doctrine for tidewaters.

The General Assembly finds and declares that the State of Georgia became the owner of the beds of all tidewaters within the jurisdiction of the State of Georgia as successor to the Crown of England and by the common law.
The State of Georgia continues to hold title to the beds of all tidewaters within the state, except where title in a private party can be traced to a valid Crown or state grant which explicitly conveyed the beds of such tidewaters.
The General Assembly further finds that the State of Georgia, as sovereign, is trustee of the rights of the people of the state to use and enjoy all tidewaters which are capable of use for fishing, passage, navigation, commerce, and transportation, pursuant to the common law public trust doctrine. Therefore, the General Assembly declares that the protection of tidewaters for use by the state and its citizens has more than local significance, is of equal importance to all citizens of the state, is of state-wide concern, and, consequently, is properly a matter for regulation under the police powers of the state.
The General Assembly further finds and declares that structures located upon tidewaters which are used as places of habitation, dwelling, sojournment, or residence interfere with the state’s proprietary interest or the public trust, or both, and must be removed to ensure the rights of the state and the people of the State of Georgia to the use and enjoyment of such tidewaters.
It is declared to be a policy of this state and the intent of this article to protect the tidewaters of the state by authorizing the commissioner of natural resources to remove or require removal of certain structures from such tidewaters in accordance with the procedures and within the timetable set forth in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1.

Law reviews.

For survey article on real property law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (2007).

For survey article on law of torts, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (2007).

52-1-3.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Natural Resources.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources.

“Structure” means any structure located upon any tidewaters of this state, whether such structure is floating upon such tidewaters and is made fast by the use of lines, cables, anchors, or pilings, or any combination thereof, or is built upon pilings embedded in the beds of such tidewaters when such structure is being or has been used or is capable of being used as a place of habitation, dwelling, sojournment, or residence for any length of time; is not being used or is not capable of being used as a means of transportation upon such tidewaters; and is not owned, occupied, or possessed pursuant to a permit issued by the commissioner pursuant to Code Section 52-1-10. Such structures may include, but are not limited to, vessels not being used in navigation; provided, however, that structures do not include live-aboard vessels, as defined in Code Section 52-7-8.4. Structures shall also not include fishing camps, bait shops, restaurants, or other commercial establishments permitted under Part 4 of Article 4 of Chapter 5 of Title 12, the “Coastal Marshlands Protection Act of 1970,” as amended, which do not discharge sewage into the waters of this state and are operated in conformance with the zoning ordinances, if any, of the municipality or county in which they are located.

“Tidewaters” means the sea and all rivers and arms of the sea that are affected by the tide, where the tide rises and falls, which are capable of use for fishing, passage, navigation, commerce, or transportation, and which are located within the jurisdiction of the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 52; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1074, § 4/SB 319; Ga. L. 2019, p. 741, § 2/HB 201.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in paragraph (3), substituted “live-aboard vessels, as defined in Code Section 52-7-8.4” for “live-aboards, as defined in Code Section 12-5-282” near the end of the next-to-last sentence, and substituted “this state” for “the state” in the middle of the last sentence.

52-1-4.
Declaration of public nuisance.

The existence of a structure as defined in this article is declared to be a public nuisance and unlawful.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1.

52-1-5.
Order for removal of structures; service and posting of order.

Whenever the commissioner determines that any structure as defined in this article exists, the commissioner may issue an order directed “TO ALL PERSONS IN POSSESSION OR CLAIMING OWNERSHIP OF THIS STRUCTURE.”
The order shall describe the structure in reasonable detail, shall set forth the unlawful nature of the structure, and shall order that the structure be removed within a reasonable time after the order becomes final to be prescribed in such order. Any order issued by the commissioner under this article shall be signed by the commissioner.
Any such order shall become final unless any person in possession of the structure or any person claiming ownership of or an interest in the structure requests in writing a hearing pursuant to Code Section 52-1-6. The order shall apprise the person or persons of their right to request a hearing and of the procedures necessary to obtain a hearing pursuant to Code Section 52-1-6.
The order, in all cases, shall be served by initially publishing the same once each week for two successive weeks in a newspaper printed and published in the county in which the structure is located or in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the structure is located.
The order shall then be served by a peace officer upon any person of suitable age and discretion found in possession of the structure or, if no such person is found in possession of the structure, the peace officer shall securely post the order in a conspicuous place on the structure.
Any order so posted must be protected from the weather by encasing same in a weatherproof, transparent material.
The date of service shall be stated within the order. The return of the service signed by the peace officer and filed in the office of the commissioner, stating that a copy of such order was served either upon a person of suitable age and discretion in possession of the structure personally or that no such person was found in possession of the structure and that a copy of the order was posted in a conspicuous place on the structure in accordance with this Code section, shall be sufficient evidence as to the service of such person in possession; provided, however, that where the address of the person or persons claiming ownership of the structure is known, a copy of such order shall be mailed to such persons by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery as part of the service process during the period of time that the order is being published in the newspaper.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

52-1-6.
Hearings and review.

Any person in possession of the structure or any person claiming ownership of or an interest in the structure which is the subject of an order issued pursuant to Code Section 52-1-5 or Code Section 52-1-10 shall, upon petition in writing within 30 days after service of such order, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board. Such petition must be filed with the administrative law judge and must be received by the administrative law judge within such 30 day period.
The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. Unless waived by the commissioner, any person seeking a hearing has the burden of going forward with evidence regarding possession or ownership of or an interest in the structure, and the administrative law judge shall take evidence and hear arguments on this issue and thereafter make a ruling on this issue before continuing with the hearing. Any decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board, and any party to the hearing, including the commissioner, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50. The hearing and review procedure provided for the petitioner in this Code section is to the exclusion of all other means of hearing or review.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1.

52-1-7.
Seizure and removal of structures; notice; sale or disposal.

Whenever any order issued by the commissioner pursuant to Code Section 52-1-5 becomes final or whenever any order adverse to the owner or possessor of a structure issued by the administrative law judge pursuant to Code Section 52-1-6 becomes final by being unappealed or affirmed upon appeal, the structure shall be deemed contraband.
Upon the structure’s becoming contraband, the commissioner or his duly authorized agents shall seize and remove said structure and may sell or dispose of such structure in such manner as the commissioner may direct; provided, however, that prior to such seizure the commissioner shall securely post a notice in a conspicuous place on the structure and, if the address of any person or persons claiming ownership of or any person or persons in possession of the structure is known, the commissioner shall mail a copy of such notice to such person or persons by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery informing such person or persons claiming ownership of or in possession of the structure that such structure is considered contraband as a matter of law and that unless the structure is removed within 30 days of the date of the notice, the commissioner, through his duly appointed agents, shall seize and remove said structure and may sell or dispose of such structure in such manner as the commissioner may direct.
Any such notice so posted must be protected from the weather by encasing same in a weatherproof, transparent material.
In the event the commissioner sells the structure or the materials of such structure, he may credit and retain the proceeds of such sale against the cost of the removal and disposal of the structure and any remaining balance shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “structure’s” was substituted for “structure” in the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

52-1-8.
Remedies not exclusive.

Except as otherwise provided for in this article, any remedy provided for in this article shall be in addition to any other remedy available to the state, any littoral proprietor within this state, or any other citizen of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1.

52-1-9.
Allowance of time for finding new residence.

In the event the commissioner determines that the seizure and removal of a structure shall result in the removal of a person or persons from a permanent residence, the commissioner may, at the end of the 30 day period set forth in Code Section 52-1-7, allow a reasonable period of time for the structure inhabitants to find a new residence prior to the removal of the structure.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1.

52-1-10.
Issuance of permit; term; revocation.

The commissioner may, after July 1, 1992, issue a permit for a maximum term of five years for the location, usage, and possession of a structure which existed on February 1, 1992, upon tidewaters of the state; provided, however, that no permit shall be issued for any structure which does not conform to and meet the requirements of rules and regulations promulgated by the board establishing minimum standards of sanitation, safety, and construction. No permit shall be issued for a term ending after June 30, 1997.

No permit issued by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be renewable and a permit may be revoked by the commissioner at any time during its term for failure to continue to meet the requirements of the board’s rules.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-1-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2317, § 1.